Utah statutes.
59-2-301.2.    Definitions -- Assessment of property subject to a minimum parcel size -- Other factors affecting fair market value.

(1)  "Minimum parcel size" means the minimum size that a parcel of property may be divided into under a zoning ordinance adopted by a:

(a)  county in accordance with Title 17, Chapter 27a, Part 5, Land Use Ordinances; or

(b)  city or town in accordance with Title 10, Chapter 9a, Part 5, Land Use Ordinances.

(2)  In assessing the fair market value of a parcel of property that is subject to a minimum parcel size of one acre or more, a county assessor shall include as part of the assessment:

(a)  that the parcel of property may not be subdivided into parcels of property smaller than the minimum parcel size; and

(b)  any effects Subsection (2)(a) may have on the fair market value of the parcel of property.

(3)  This section does not prohibit a county assessor from including as part of an assessment of the fair market value of a parcel of property any other factor affecting the fair market value of the parcel of property.

